Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1201 to 38-1239 shall be known and may be cited as the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 128;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5172;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 485;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB910, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 1.